Utah statutes.
3-1-18.   Inducing breach of contract -- False reports -- Penalty.
A person or corporation whose officers or employees knowingly induce or
attempt to induce a member or stockholder of an association to violate his
marketing contract with the association, or who intentionally spreads false
reports about its finances or management:
(1)  is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and is subject to a fine of not more
than $2,500 for each offense; and
(2)  may be held liable in a civil action to the association.
